Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8601
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-8601 to 71-8616 shall be known and may be cited as the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired Act.

Laws 2000, LB 352, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB445, § 1.